scratch/test_chained/test.aff
# Test for suffix chaining and stem class voicing/vowel-drop/doubling
SET UTF-8
FLAG long
LANG tr

TRY aeıioöuübcdfgğhjklmnprsştvyz

# Stem class V1: voicing consonant stem
SFX V1 Y 2
SFX V1 0 0 .
SFX V1 p b/AC,DA,P1 p

# Stem class B1: non-voicing consonant stem
SFX B1 Y 1
SFX B1 0 0 .

# AC flag (Accusative): applied directly or via chaining
SFX AC Y 1
SFX AC 0 ı [^aeıioöuü]

# DA flag (Dative)
SFX DA Y 1
SFX DA 0 a [^aeıioöuü]

# LO flag (Locative): unvoiced ending
SFX LO Y 2
SFX LO 0 ta [çfhkpsşt]
SFX LO 0 da [^çfhkpsşt]

# P1 flag (1sg possessive)
SFX P1 Y 1
SFX P1 0 ım [^aeıioöuü]
